test/src/morphology/N-leentsh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lēņtš*: # Noun 150 'eng /est lääs/fin' - full paradigm
     lēņtš*+N+Sg+Nom: lēņtš*
     lēņtš*+N+Sg+Gen: lǟnd
     lēņtš*+N+Sg+Par: lǟndtõ
     lēņtš*+N+Sg+Dat: lǟndõn
     lēņtš*+N+Sg+Ins: lǟndkõks
     lēņtš*+N+Sg+Ill: lǟndõ
     lēņtš*+N+Sg+Ela: lǟndstõ
     lēņtš*+N+Pl+Nom: lǟndõd
     lēņtš*+N+Pl+Gen: [lǟndõ, d]
     lēņtš*+N+Pl+Par: lēņtši
     lēņtš*+N+Pl+Dat: lǟndõdõn
     lēņtš*+N+Pl+Ins: lǟndõdõks
     lēņtš*+N+Pl+Ill: —
     lēņtš*+N+Pl+Ela: —
